Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.020

Appellate jurisdiction.

The superior courts shall have such appellate jurisdiction in cases arising in courts of limited jurisdiction in their respective counties as may be prescribed by law.

[ 1987 c 202 s 102; 1890 p 343 s 6; RRS s 17.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: See Rules for Appeal of Decisions of Courts of Limited Jurisdiction (RALJ).

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Appeals from

district courts: Criminal, chapter 10.10 RCW; civil, chapter 12.36 RCW.

municipal courts: Chapter 35.20 RCW.

Jurisdiction of superior courts: State Constitution Art. 4 s 6 (Amendment 28).